District of Columbia statutes.
47-1816.02

Rules and regulations — Revenue Act of 1956.

The Mayor is authorized to make rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this Act.

Mar. 31, 1956, 70 Stat. 84, ch. 154, title VI, § 601
July 24, 1982, D.C. Law 4-131, § 108(a), (b), 29 DCR 2418
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

History

1981 Ed., § 47-1816.2.
1973 Ed., § 47-1595a.

Prior Codifications

“This Act,” referred to in this section, is 70 Stat. 71, ch. 154, approved March 31, 1956.

References in Text